dictsource/cnr_rules
// ***************************************************************************/ 
// *   Montenegrin Language cnr cnr_rules                                    *
// *   Original Author Andy Vladescu, 2025                                   *
// *   Contact info: andyvladescu770@gmail.com                               *
// ***************************************************************************/
// *   This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify  *
// *   it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by  *
// *   the Free Software Foundation; either version 3 of the License, or     *
// *   (at your option) any later version.                                   *
// *                                                                         *
// *   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,       *
// *   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of        *
// *   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the         *
// *   GNU General Public License for more details.                          *
// *                                                                         *
// *   You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License     *
// *   along with this program; if not, see:                                 *
// *               <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.                           *
// ***************************************************************************/

//The next line gives a voice which is used to find a phoneme table to use to compile this dictionary
//voice=hr


.replace
//	Cyrl	Latn	-- Cyrillic to Latin
	а	a	// U+0430
	б	b	// U+0431
	в	v	// U+0432
	г	g	// U+0433
	д	d	// U+0434
	е	e	// U+0435
	ж	ž	// U+0436
	з	z	// U+0437
	з́   ź   // U+0179
	и	i	// U+0438
	к	k	// U+043A
	л	l	// U+043B
	м	m	// U+043C
	н	n	// U+043D
	о	o	// U+043E
	п	p	// U+043F
	р	r	// U+0440
	с	s	// U+0441
	с́   ś   // U+0301
	т	t	// U+0442
	у	u	// U+0443
	ф	f	// U+0444
	х	h	// U+0445
	ц	c	// U+0446
	ч	č	// U+0447
	ш	š	// U+0161
	ђ	đ	// U+0452
	ѓ	đ	// U+0453
	ѕ	dz	// U+0455
	ј	j	// U+0458
	љ	lj	// U+0459
	њ	nj	// U+045A
	ћ	ć	// U+045B
	ќ	ć	// U+045C
	џ	dž	// U+045F

.group a
        a        a
     X) a ($w_alt1 a:
        a (j     A
        a (r     A        // don't reduce to [&]
        
   _hrv) a (t    a:

.group b
        b        b

.group c
        c        ts

.group č
        č        tS

.group ć
        ć        tS;

.group d
        d        d
        dz       dz
     _) dz (_    dz@
        dž       dZ
     _) dž (_    dZ@

.group đ
        đ        dZ;

.group e
        e        E
     X) e ($w_alt1 E:
     j) e        e
        e (j     e
     _) exe      %ekse        // filetype

.group f
        f        f

.group g
        g        g

.group h
        h        h
     _) h        x

.group i
        i        i
     X) i ($w_alt1 i:
    ._) ini      %ini         // filetype

.group j
        j        j
    XA) j (_     j_      // short pause after final [j] in one-syllable words

.group k
        k        k

.group l
        l        l
     K) l (K     l-
     
     _) lj (_    l^@
        lj (+    l^
     v) lj       lj

.group m
        m        m

.group n
        n        n
        n (g     N
        n (k     N

        nj       n^
     _) nj (_    n^@

.group o
        o        o
     X) o ($w_alt1 o:
        ou       oU

.group p
        p        p

.group q
        q        k
        qu       kv

.group r
        r        R
     A) r (A     R
     K) r (A     r*    // this phoneme expands to [@-*]
        rr       R
        r (_     R

     K) r (K     R2


.group s
        s        s

.group š
        š        S

.group t
        t        t

.group u
        u        u
     X) u ($w_alt1 u:

.group v
        v        v

.group w
        w        v

.group x
        x        ks

.group y
        y        j
     K) y (K     i


.group z
        z        z

.group ž
        ž        Z

.group
        á        a:
        é        e:
        í        i:
        ó        o:
        ú        u:

        ä        _^_DE   // use German voice
        ö        _^_DE
        ü        _^_DE
        ß        _^_DE

        $        d'ol&R

   __)  - (_D    minus
   A_)  - (_D    _
   C_)  - (_D    _


.group 0xce   // Greek letters

	α	'alf&
	ά	'alf&||t'onos
	β	b'et&
	γ	g'am&
	δ	d'elt&
	ε	'epsIlon
	έ	'epsIlon||t'onos
	ζ	z'et&
	η	'et&
	ή	'et&||t'onos
	θ	tx'et&
	ι	j'ot&
	ί	j'ot&||t'onos
	κ	k'ap&
	λ	l'amd&
	μ	m'i
	ν	n'i
	ξ	ks'i
	ο	'omIkr*on_

.group 0xcf   // Greek letters

	π	p'i
	ρ	R'o
	σ	s'igm&
	ς	gr-tSko_||z'avr-Sno_||s'igm&
	τ	t'au
	υ	gr-tSki_||'ipsIlon
	ύ	gr-tSki||'ipsIlon||t'onos
	φ	f'i
	χ	x'i
	ψ	ps'i
	ω	'omeg&
	ώ	'omeg&||t'onos
	ό	'omIkr*on||t'onos
